Utah statutes.
63B-3-301.   Legislative intent -- Additional projects.
(1)  It is the intent of the Legislature that, for any lease purchase
agreement that the Legislature may authorize the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management to enter into during its 1994 Annual General
Session, the State Building Ownership Authority, at the reasonable rates and
amounts it may determine, and with technical assistance from the state
treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance, and the director of the
Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, may seek out the most cost effective
and prudent lease purchase plans available to the state and may, pursuant to
Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State Building Ownership Authority Act,
certificate out interests in, or obligations of the authority pertaining to:
(a)  the lease purchase obligation; or
(b)  lease rental payments under the lease purchase obligation.
(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Transportation
dispose of surplus real properties and use the proceeds from those properties
to acquire or construct through the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management a new District Two Complex.
(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Building Board
allocate funds from the Capital Improvement appropriation and donations to
cover costs associated with the upgrade of the Governor's Residence that go
beyond the restoration costs which can be covered by insurance proceeds.
(4) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the State Building
Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, to issue or execute obligations or enter
into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation
interests may be created, to provide up to $10,600,000 for the construction of
a Natural Resources Building in Salt Lake City, together with additional
amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the operating budget for the
Department of Natural Resources not be increased to fund these lease payments.
(5) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the State Building
Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, to issue or execute obligations or enter
into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation
interests may be created, to provide up to $8,300,000 for the acquisition of
the office buildings currently occupied by the Department of Environmental
Quality and approximately 19 acres of additional vacant land at the Airport
East Business Park in Salt Lake City, together with additional amounts
necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(6) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the State Building
Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, to issue or execute obligations or enter
into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation
interests may be created, to provide up to $9,000,000 for the acquisition or
construction of up to two field offices for the Department of Human Services
in the southwestern portion of Salt Lake County, together with additional
amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(7) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the State Building
Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, to issue or execute obligations or enter
into or arrange for lease purchase agreements in which participation interests
may be created, to provide up to $5,000,000 for the acquisition or
construction of up to 13 stores for the Department of Alcoholic Beverage
Control, together with additional amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(c)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the operating budget for the
Department of Alcoholic Beverage Control not be increased to fund these lease
payments.
(8) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the State Building
Ownership Authority under authority of Title 63B, Chapter 1, Part 3, State
Building Ownership Authority Act, to issue or execute obligations or enter
into or arrange for a lease purchase agreement in which participation
interests may be created, to provide up to $6,800,000 for the construction of
a Prerelease and Parole Center for the Department of Corrections, containing a
minimum of 300 beds, together with additional amounts necessary to:
(i)  pay costs of issuance;
(ii)  pay capitalized interest; and
(iii)  fund any debt service reserve requirements.
(b)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the authority seek out the most
cost effective and prudent lease purchase plan available with technical
assistance from the state treasurer, the director of the Division of Finance,
and the director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.
(9)  If S.B.  275, 1994 General Session, which authorizes funding for a Courts
Complex in Salt Lake City, becomes law, it is the intent of the Legislature
that:
(a)  the Legislative Management Committee, the Interim Appropriation
Subcommittees for General Government and Capital Facilities and Executive
Offices, Courts, and Corrections, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal
Analyst, the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget, and the State Building
Board participate in a review of the proposed facility design for the Courts
Complex no later than December 1994; and
(b)  although this review will not affect the funding authorization issued by
the 1994 Legislature, it is expected that Division of Facilities Construction
and Management will give proper attention to concerns raised in these reviews
and make appropriate design changes pursuant to the review.
(10)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, in cooperation
with the Division of Youth Corrections renamed in 2003 to the Division of
Juvenile Justice Services, develop a flexible use prototype facility for the
Division of Youth Corrections renamed in 2003 to the Division of Juvenile
Justice Services;
(b)  the development process use existing prototype proposals unless it can be
quantifiably demonstrated that the proposals cannot be used;
(c)  the facility is designed so that with minor modifications, it can
accommodate detention, observation and assessment, transition, and secure
programs as needed at specific geographical locations;
(d) (i)  funding as provided in the fiscal year 1995 bond authorization for
the Division of Youth Corrections renamed in 2003 to the Division of Juvenile
Justice Services is used to design and construct one facility and design the
other;
(ii)  the Division of Youth Corrections renamed in 2003 to the Division of
Juvenile Justice Services shall:
(A)  determine the location for the facility for which design and construction
are fully funded; and
(B)  in conjunction with the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management, determine the best methodology for design and construction of the
fully funded facility;
(e)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management submit the
prototype as soon as possible to the Capital Facilities and Administrative
Services Appropriation Subcommittee and Executive Offices, Criminal Justice,
and Legislature Appropriation Subcommittee for review;
(f)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management issue a Request
for Proposal for one of the facilities, with that facility designed and
constructed entirely by the winning firm;
(g)  the other facility be designed and constructed under the existing
Division of Facilities Construction and Management process;
(h)  that both facilities follow the program needs and specifications as
identified by Division of Facilities Construction and Management and the
Division of Youth Corrections renamed in 2003 to the Division of Juvenile
Justice Services in the prototype; and
(i)  the fully funded facility should be ready for occupancy by September 1,
1995.
(11)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the fiscal year 1995 funding
for the State Fair Park Master Study be used by the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management to develop a master plan for the State Fair Park
that:
(a)  identifies capital facilities needs, capital improvement needs, building
configuration, and other long term needs and uses of the State Fair Park and
its buildings; and
(b)  establishes priorities for development, estimated costs, and projected
timetables.
(12)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management, in cooperation
with the Division of Parks and Recreation and surrounding counties, develop a
master plan and general program for the phased development of Antelope Island;
(b)  the master plan:
(i)  establish priorities for development;
(ii)  include estimated costs and projected time tables; and
(iii)  include recommendations for funding methods and the allocation of
responsibilities between the parties; and
(c)  the results of the effort be reported to the Natural Resources
Appropriations Subcommittee and Capital Facilities and Administrative Services
Appropriation Subcommittee.
(13)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the University of Utah
to use:
(a)  bond reserves to plan, design, and construct the Kingsbury Hall
renovation under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the
director; and
(b)  donated and other nonappropriated funds to plan, design, and construct
the Biology Research Building under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director.
(14)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize Utah State University
to use:
(a)  federal and other funds to plan, design, and construct the Bee Lab under
the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director;
(b)  donated and other nonappropriated funds to plan, design, and construct an
Athletic Facility addition and renovation under the supervision of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority is delegated by the director;
(c)  donated and other nonappropriated funds to plan, design, and construct a
renovation to the Nutrition and Food Science Building under the supervision of
the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority is delegated by the director; and
(d)  federal and private funds to plan, design, and construct the Millville
Research Facility under the supervision of the director of the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is
delegated by the director.
(15)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize Salt Lake Community
College to use:
(a)  institutional funds to plan, design, and construct a remodel to the Auto
Trades Office and Learning Center under the supervision of the director of the
Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory
authority is delegated by the director;
(b)  institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the relocation and
expansion of a temporary maintenance compound under the supervision of the
director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless
supervisory authority is delegated by the director; and
(c)  institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the Alder Amphitheater
under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the
director.
(16)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize Southern Utah
University to use:
(a)  federal funds to plan, design, and construct a Community Services
Building under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the
director; and
(b)  donated and other nonappropriated funds to plan, design, and construct a
stadium expansion under the supervision of the director of the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is
delegated by the director.
(17)  It is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the Department of
Corrections to use donated funds to plan, design, and construct a Prison
Chapel at the Central Utah Correctional Facility in Gunnison under the
supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and
Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the director.
(18)  If the Utah National Guard does not relocate in the Signetics Building,
it is the intent of the Legislature to authorize the Guard to use federal
funds and funds from Provo City to plan and design an Armory in Provo, Utah,
under the supervision of the director of the Division of Facilities
Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is delegated by the
director.
(19)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Utah Department of
Transportation use $250,000 of the fiscal year 1995 highway appropriation to
fund an environmental study in Ogden, Utah of the 2600 North Corridor between
Washington Boulevard and I-15.
(20)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Ogden-Weber Applied
Technology Center use the monies appropriated for fiscal year 1995 to design
the Metal Trades Building and purchase equipment for use in that building that
could be used in metal trades or other programs in other Applied Technology
Centers.
(21)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Bridgerland Applied
Technology Center and the Ogden-Weber Applied Technology Center projects as
designed in fiscal year 1995 be considered as the highest priority projects
for construction funding in fiscal year 1996.
(22)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management complete physical
space utilization standards by June 30, 1995, for the use of technology
education activities;
(b)  these standards are to be developed with and approved by the State Office
of Education, the Board of Regents, and the Utah State Building Board;
(c)  these physical standards be used as the basis for:
(i)  determining utilization of any technology space based on number of
stations capable and occupied for any given hour of operation; and
(ii)  requests for any new space or remodeling;
(d)  the fiscal year 1995 projects at the Bridgerland Applied Technology
Center and the Ogden-Weber Applied Technology Center are exempt from this
process; and
(e)  the design of the Davis Applied Technology Center take into account the
utilization formulas established by the Division of Facilities Construction
and Management.
(23)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Utah Valley State College  may
use the monies from the bond allocated to the remodel of the Signetics
building to relocate its technical education programs at other designated
sites or facilities under the supervision of the director of the Division of
Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority is
delegated by the director.
(24)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the monies provided for the
fiscal year 1995 project for the Bridgerland Applied Technology Center be used
to design and construct the space associated with Utah State University and
design the technology center portion of the project.
(25)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the governor provide periodic
reports on the expenditure of the funds provided for electronic technology,
equipment, and hardware to the Information Technology Commission, the Capital
Facilities and Administrative Services Appropriation Subcommittee, and the
Legislative Management Committee.
